Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.180

Total confinement.

"Total confinement" has the same meaning as in RCW 9.94A.030, but a sentence of total confinement does not include confinement imposed as a sanction for a community custody violation under RCW 9.94A.633(1).

[ 2021 c 10 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.08.520.